Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1011
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of sections 81-1008 to 81-1025:

(1) Bureau means the
transportation services bureau of the Department of Administrative Services;

(2) Bureau fleet vehicle
includes any state-owned vehicle and any passenger vehicle rented from a third-party
fleet owner for use by a state employee for transportation in his or her official
duties from one job location to another; and

(3)(a) State-owned vehicle means all passenger vehicles
acquired primarily for the purpose of transporting state employees in their
official duties from one job location to another.

(b) State-owned vehicle does not
include special-use vehicles, such as buses, laundry trucks, mail trucks,
airport security vehicles, or military
trucks and cars;
vehicles which are considered a duty station, such as vehicles used by the
Nebraska State Patrol, the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, or conservation officers of the Game and Parks Commission; or
those vehicles which, by nature of their usage, require the installation or
carrying of special equipment which precludes the use of such vehicles for
multiple agency transportation usage.

Laws 1969, c. 770, § 4, p. 2920;

Laws 1975, LB 474, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 709, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB779, § 4.